District of Columbia statutes.
1-611.16

Pay limitations under other laws.

(a)

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 2-1605 or § 23-1306, or any other provision or law, no employee of the District of Columbia government shall be authorized to receive pay in excess of that provided for in this subchapter, and any such provision of law that is inconsistent with this section shall be deemed superseded to the extent of such inconsistency.

(b)

No employee of the District of Columbia shall be paid at an annualized rate that is higher than the maximum salary for the highest pay grade for which the employee’s position is classified.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1117
as added June 11, 1981, D.C. Law 4-7, § 2, 28 DCR 1672
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 104(b), 47 DCR 520
Mar. 14, 2012, D.C. Law 19-115, § 2(i), 59 DCR 461

Cross References

Board of elections and ethics, powers and duties, see § 1-1001.05.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1001.05 and § 1-1162.06.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-612.16.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-91 deleted “§ 2-309, § 2-327(a),” preceding “§ 1-2705,”.
D.C. Law 19-115 designated the existing text as subsec. (a); and added subsec. (b).